Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2050HH (4) 91 sc/js H.F. 429 Section 1. Section 29A.53, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of 3 the Code, the army national guard, the air national guard, and 4 the civil air patrol shall not be released from this state into 5 active combat or into hazardous service relating to an armed 6 conflict in a foreign state pursuant to Article I, section 8, 7 clause 15, of the United States Constitution, unless the United 8 States has officially declared war for the express purpose 9 of repelling an invasion, suppressing an insurrection, or 10 executing the laws of the United States. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. This section shall not be construed 12 to limit the authority of the governor to consent to the 13 deployment of troops pursuant to Tit. 32 of the United States 14 Code. 15 Sec. 2. FEDERAL POWERS TO DECLARE WAR ââ LEGISLATIVE 16 FINDINGS. The general assembly finds that Article I, section 17 8, of the Constitution of the United States solely vests 18 the power to declare war in the United States Congress, and 19 Congress, by abdicating its war powers to the president, has 20 failed to follow the Constitution of the United States and the 21 intent of its creators. 22